apertium-grc.grc.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Ancient Greek

# {ε} verb past tense augment
# {+long} lengthening
# {+longd} lengthening to diphthong
# {σ} disappearing sigma
# {(ν)} movable nu
# {'} stress location (assign stress to vowel preceding last of these)
# {~} stress location, circumflex if possible
# {'?} {~?} potential stress locations in noun suffixes
# {'$} final symbol which enables {'?} and {~?}
# {|} block normal merges
# {clt} this is a clitic
# {οω} switch vowel length in final stem suffix by form

##################################################
# NOUNS
##################################################

# TODO: organize

PATTERNS
NOUN
Ω-VERB
ΜΙ-VERB
Adjectives
Determiners
RelativePronoun
Conjunctions
Relatives
Prepositions
PersonalPronouns
ReflexivePronouns
Itg/IndefPronouns
Negation
Adverbs
Demonstratives
Numbers
Interjections
Punctuation

PATTERN NOUN
NounStem[ο-ου,το,'$] CaseNumber[ο-ου,το,'$]

NounStem[indec-sg] CaseNumber[indec-sg]

IrregCommonNouns
IrregProperNouns

NounStem[ις-δος,'$] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(4))
NounStem[ις-δος,-'$] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(5))
NounStem[ος-ους,το] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(6))
[:{'}] NounStem[ις-εως,η] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(7))
NounStem[ευς-εως,ο] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(8))
NounStem[ευς-εως,ο] [<pl><nom>:ει{~}ς] # Dir/LR

#NounStem[ηρ-ρος,ο,'$] (Dec3B(1): Dec3B(2)) [:{'$}]
#NounStem[ηρ-ρος,η,-'$] (Dec3B(1): Dec3B(2))

[:{'}] NormalStressNouns['$] [:{'$}]
[:{'}] NormalStressNouns[-'$]

[:{'}] NounStem[α-ης,η] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(4)) | Dec1Pl
[:{'}] NounStem[α-ας,η] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(5)) | Dec1Pl
[:{'}] NounStem[ᾱς-ου,ο] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(7)) | Dec1Pl

PATTERN NormalStressNouns
NounStem[ᾱ-ᾱς,η] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(2)) | Dec1Pl
NounStem[η-ης,η] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(3)) | Dec1Pl
NounStem[ης-ου,ο] (Dec1Sg(1): :Dec1Sg(6)) | Dec1Pl

NounStem[ος-ου,η] (Dec2(1): :Dec2(2))
NounStem[ος-ου,ο] (Dec2(1): :Dec2(2))
NounStem[ον-ου,το] (Dec2(1): :Dec2(3))

NounStem[_-ος,-1σ] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(2))
NounStem[_-ος,1σ] (Dec3B(1) :Dec3B(3))
NounStem[ς-ος,-1σ] (Dec3(1) :Dec3(3))
NounStem[ς-ος,1σ] (Dec3B(1) :Dec3B(4))

NounStem[ηρ-ρος] (Dec3B(1): Dec3B(2))

NounStem[ας-α] CaseNumber[ας-α]

PATTERN NounStem
NounRoot[ο] [<n><m>:]
NounRoot[η] [<n><f>:]
NounRoot[το] [<n><nt>:]
ProperNouns[ο] [<np><m>:]
ProperNouns[η] [<np><f>:]
ProperNouns[το] [<np><nt>:]

LEXICON CaseNumber
<sg><nom>:ο{'}[ο-ου,το,'$]
<sg><gen>:ου{~}[ο-ου,το,'$]
<sg><dat>:ῳ{~}[ο-ου,το,'$]
<sg><acc>:ο{'}[ο-ου,το,'$]
#<sg><voc>:[ο-ου,το,'$]

<pl><nom>:α{'}[ο-ου,το,'$]
<pl><gen>:ω{~}ν[ο-ου,το,'$]
<pl><dat>:οι{~}ς[ο-ου,το,'$]
<pl><acc>:α{'}[ο-ου,το,'$]
#<pl><voc>:[ο-ου,το,'$]

<sg><nom>:[indec-sg]
<sg><gen>:[indec-sg]
<sg><dat>:[indec-sg]
<sg><acc>:[indec-sg]
<sg><voc>:[indec-sg]

<sg><nom>:α{+long}{~?}ς[ας-α]
<sg><gen>:α{+long}{~?}[ας-α]
<sg><dat>:ᾳ{~?}[ας-α]
<sg><acc>:α{+long}{~?}ν[ας-α]
<sg><voc>:α{+long}{~?}[ας-α]

LEXICON Dec1Sg(7)
# 2 - Fᾱ
# 3 - Fη
# 4 - Fα/ης
# 5 - Fα/ας
# 6 - Mης
# 7 - Mᾱς

<sg><nom> α{+long}{'?}  η{'?}  α{'?}  α{'?}         η{'?}ς α{+long}{'?}ς
<sg><gen> α{+long}{~?}ς η{~?}ς η{~?}ς α{+long}{~?}ς ου{~?} ου{~?}
<sg><dat> ᾳ{~?}         ῃ{~?}  ῃ{~?}  ᾳ{~?}         ῃ{~?}  ᾳ{~?}
<sg><acc> α{+long}{'?}ν η{'?}ν α{'?}ν α{'?}ν        η{'?}ν α{+long}{'?}ν
<sg><voc> α{+long}{'?}  η{'?}  α{'?}  α{'?}         α{'?}  α{+long}{'?}

LEXICON Dec1Pl
<pl><nom>:αι{'?}
<pl><gen>:ω{~}ν
<pl><dat>:αι{~?}ς
<pl><acc>:α{+long}{'?}ς
<pl><voc>:αι{'?}

LEXICON Dec2(3)
# 2 - MFος
# 3 - Nον

# TODO: ους = ο + ος

<sg><nom> ο{'?}ς  ο{'?}ν
<sg><gen> ου{~?}  ου{~?}
<sg><dat> ῳ{~?}   ῳ{~?}
<sg><acc> ο{'?}ν  ο{'?}ν
<sg><voc> ε{'?}   ο{'?}ν

<pl><nom> οι{'?}  α{'?}
<pl><gen> ω{~?}ν  ω{~?}ν
<pl><dat> οι{~?}ς οι{~?}ς
<pl><acc> ου{'?}ς α{'?}
<pl><voc> οι{'?}  α{'?}

LEXICON Dec3(8)
# 2 - N*τ _/ος
# 3 - MF*stop ς/ος
# 4 - *ίδ
# 5 - *ιδ
# 6 - ος,ους,το
# 7 - ις,ευς,η
# 8 - ευς,εως,ο

<sg><nom>:{g+} :       {'?}ς       ς       ς       ος    ις         ευ{'}ς
<sg><gen>:{g-} ος      ο{'?}ς      ος      ος      ους   εω{-long}ς ε{'}ως
<sg><dat>:{g-} ι       ι{'?}       ι       ι       ει    ει         ει{~}
<sg><acc>:{g-} :       α{'?}       α       ν       ος    ιν         ε{'}α{+long}
<sg><voc>:{g-} :       {'?}ς       :       :       ος    ι          ευ{~}

<pl><nom>:{g-} α       ε{'?}ς      ες      ες      η     εις        η{~}ς
<pl><gen>:{g-} ων      ω{~?}ν      ων      ων      ω{~}ν εων        ε{'}ων
<pl><dat>:{g-} σι{(ν)} σι{'?}{(ν)} σι{(ν)} σι{(ν)} εσιν  εσι{(ν)}   ευ{~}σι{(ν)}
<pl><acc>:{g-} ας      α{'?}ς      ας      ας      η     εις        ε{'}α{+long}ς
<pl><voc>:{g-} α       ε{'?}ς      ες      ες      η     εις        η{~}ς

LEXICON Dec3B(4)
<sg><nom>:{g+} η{'?}ρ       :          ς
<sg><gen>:{g-} ρο{'}ς       ο{'}ς      ο{'}ς
<sg><dat>:{g-} ρι{'}        ι{'}       ι{'}
<sg><acc>:{g-} ε{'}ρα       :          α
<sg><voc>:{g-} ερ           :          ς

<pl><nom>:{g-} ε{'}ρες      α          ες
<pl><gen>:{g-} ε{'}ρων      ω{~}ν      ω{~}ν
<pl><dat>:{g-} ρα{'}σι{(ν)} σι{'}{(ν)} σι{'}{(ν)}
<pl><acc>:{g-} ε{'}ρας      ας         ας
<pl><voc>:{g-} ε{'}ρες      α          ες

LEXICON NounRoot
αυτος:αὐτ[ος-ου,ο,'$]
αυτος:αὐτ[η-ης,η,'$]
αυτος:αὐτ[ο-ου,το,'$]
βιβλος:βι{'}βλ[ος-ου,η]
κυριος:κυ{'}ρι[ος-ου,ο]
θεᾱ:θε[ᾱ-ᾱς,η]
θεος:θε[ος-ου,ο,'$]
ηγεμων:ἡγεμ{οω}{'}ν[_-ος,ο,η]

# Nouns from Dodson
# TODO: check for first declension short ᾰ
